Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.11
Dealer's
agent, defined.

Dealer's agent means a person who acts as a buying agent
for one or more motor vehicle dealers, motorcycle dealers, or trailer dealers.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 23.